Washington statutes.
RCW 2.08.080

Oath of office.

Every judge of a superior court shall, before entering upon the duties of his or her office, take and subscribe an oath that he or she will support the Constitution of the United States and the Constitution of the state of Washington, and will faithfully and impartially discharge the duties of judge to the best of his or her ability, which oath shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state. Such oath or affirmation to be in form substantially the same as prescribed for justices of the supreme court.

[ 2011 c 336 s 13; 1971 c 81 s 5; 1890 p 344 s 15; RRS s 11051.]

NOTES:

Oath of judges: State Constitution Art. 4 s 28.